Utah statutes.
48-1-12.   Nature of partner's liability.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), all partners are liable:

(a)  jointly and severally for everything chargeable to the partnership under Sections 48-1-10 and 48-1-11.

(b)  jointly for all other debts and obligations of the partnership, except a partner may enter into a separate obligation to perform a partnership contract.

(2) (a)  A partner in a limited liability partnership is not liable, directly or indirectly, including by way of indemnification, contribution or otherwise, for a debt, obligation, or liability chargeable to the partnership arising from negligence, wrongful acts, or misconduct committed while the partnership is registered as a limited liability partnership and in the course of the partnership business by another partner, or an employee, agent, or representative of the limited liability partnership.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), a partner in a limited liability partnership is liable for his own negligence, wrongful acts, or misconduct.



Amended by Chapter 61, 1994 General Session

